Hawaii statutes.
§378-66 Collective bargaining and
confidentiality rights, takes precedence. (a) This subpart shall not be
construed to diminish or impair the rights of a person under any collective
bargaining agreement, nor to permit disclosures which would diminish or impair
the rights of any person to the continued protection of confidentiality of
communications where statute or common law provides such protection.

(b) Where a collective bargaining agreement
provides an employee rights and remedies superior to the rights and remedies
provided herein, contractual rights shall supersede and take precedence over
the rights, remedies, and procedures provided in this subpart. Where a
collective bargaining agreement provides inferior rights and remedies to those
provided in this subpart, the provisions of this subpart shall supersede and
take precedence over the rights, remedies, and procedures provided in
collective bargaining agreements. [L 1987, c 267, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 166, §8]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next